District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.08

Pilot program for Interim Disability Assistance.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a pilot program for providing Interim Disability Assistance, beginning no later than February 1, 2002. Eligibility for assistance under the program shall be based on a minimum appropriation of no less than $2,150,000, and assistance shall continue to be provided if additional funds in excess of the $2,150,000 become available. During any period in which eligibility for assistance is capped due to the unavailability of funds, the Mayor shall establish and maintain a waiting list of likely eligible applicants.

(b)

The Department of Human Services, Income Maintenance Administration (“IMA”) shall conduct a study to determine the size of the eligible population for assistance. The report shall be completed in time for the IMA to recommend to the Mayor the appropriate funding level for the program in Fiscal Year 2003.

(c)

Based on an analysis of the available data, including the size of the eligible population determined pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the IMA shall recommend to the Mayor the appropriate funding level to fully fund the Interim Disability Assistance program for Fiscal Year 2003.

(d)

The Mayor shall fully fund the Interim Disability Assistance program for Fiscal Year 2003 by including a line item for that purpose in the Fiscal Year 2003 base budget and operational plan.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 408
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 5002, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 29, 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4502 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 4-204.11 to 4-204.16, see §§ 1501 to 1506 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 4-204.51 to 4-204.56, see §§ 1551 to 1556 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 4-204.09, see § 1902(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).